North Carolina, session 2025, HB533.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two million four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,450,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of
Siler City for its Downtown Streetscape Project. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to run underground power lines and widen
sidewalks for outside dining along Chatham Avenue.
(2) Four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) to implement design plans and
hire a main street coordinator.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of ten million four hundred thousand dollars ($10,400,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Siler
City for replacing the Town's condemned recreational building and improving its recreational
field. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for designing and building a new
recreational facility.
(2) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for improvements at Bray Soccer
Stadium to support increased usage of the facilities and local AAU
tournaments.
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Siler City to design and build
a new fire station.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pittsboro to enhance its
emergency fire services. These funds shall be used as follows:
(1) Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) to design and build a new fire station.
(2) One million eight hundred thousand dollars ($1,800,000) to purchase a new
ladder truck.
(3) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) to purchase a new fire
engine.
*H533-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 533-First Edition